Wisconsin, session 2025, SB1055.
do enact as follows:SB1055,13Section 1. Fiscal changes.SB1055,2,24(1) Home-delivered meals. In the schedule under s. 20.005 (3) for the 5appropriation to the department of health services under s. 20.435 (1) (dh), the 6dollar amount for fiscal year 2025-26 is increased by $250,000 and the dollar 1amount for fiscal year 2026-27 is increased by $250,000 to increase the funding 2available for home-delivered meals under s. 46.80 (5) (a).SB1055,2,33